Massachusetts, session 194th, S172.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1 of Chapter 19C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after the words “police officer”, in the definition of “Mandated
reporter”, the following words:- “, firefighter, emergency medical technician,”.
of 1